Iowa, session 2025-2026, SSB1060.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2235XC (2) 91 nls/ko S.F. _____ Section 1. Section 514C.4A, subsection 1, Code 2025, is 1 amended by adding the following new paragraph: 2 NEW PARAGRAPH . 0c. âCost-sharingâ means any coverage limit, 3 copayment, coinsurance, deductible, or other out-of-pocket cost 4 obligation imposed by a policy, contract, or plan providing for 5 third-party payment or prepayment of health or medical expenses 6 on a covered person. 7 Sec. 2. Section 514C.4A, subsection 2, Code 2025, is amended 8 by adding the following new paragraph: 9 NEW PARAGRAPH . c. Cost-sharing shall not be imposed for 10 coverage required under this section. 11 Sec. 3. Section 514C.4A, subsection 3, Code 2025, is amended 12 by adding the following new paragraph: 13 NEW PARAGRAPH . c. If a covered personâs policy, contract, 14 or plan providing for third-party payment or prepayment of 15 health or medical expenses qualifies as a high-deductible 16 health plan under section 223 of the Internal Revenue Code, 17 subsection 2, paragraph âcâ , shall apply only after the covered 18 person satisfies the covered personâs minimum deductible, 19 except for items or services determined to be preventive care 20 under section 223(c)(2)(C) of the Internal Revenue Code. 21 Sec. 4. APPLICABILITY. This Act applies to third-party 22 payment provider contracts, policies, or plans delivered, 23 issued for delivery, continued, or renewed in this state on or 24 after January 1, 2026. 25